Massachusetts, session 194th, S2553.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. (a) Notwithstanding section 17 of chapter 138 of the General Laws, the
licensing authority of the town of Berkley may grant up to five (5) additional licenses for the sale
of all alcoholic beverages to be drunk on the premises pursuant to section 15 of said chapter 138
to establishments located within the Town of Berkley's General Business District, as identified
on the "Town of Berkley Zoning Map", as may be amended from time to time. The license shall
be subject to all of said chapter 138 except said section 17, with such conditions and restrictions
as the licensing authority shall deem appropriate.
(b) If a license granted pursuant to this act is cancelled, revoked or no longer in use at the
location of original issuance, it shall be returned physically, with all of the legal rights, privileges
and restrictions pertaining thereto, to the licensing authority and the licensing authority may then
grant the license to a new applicant.
of 2

SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 2